Utah statutes.
76-7-101.   Bigamy -- Defense.

(1) A person is guilty of bigamy when, knowing he has a husband or wife or knowing the other person has a husband or wife, the person purports to marry another person or cohabits with another person.

(2)  Bigamy is a felony of the third degree.

(3)  It shall be a defense to bigamy that the accused reasonably believed he and the other person were legally eligible to remarry.

